Utah statutes.
63H-1-202.    Applicability of other law.

(1)  The authority or land within a project area is not subject to:

(a)  Title 10, Chapter 9a, Municipal Land Use, Development, and Management Act;

(b)  Title 17, Chapter 27a, County Land Use, Development, and Management Act;

(c)  any ordinances or regulations of a county or municipality, including those relating to land use, health, business license, or franchise; or

(d)  the jurisdiction of any local district under Title 17B, Limited Purpose Local Government Entities - Local Districts, or special service district under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special Service District Act.

(2)  The authority is subject to and governed by Sections 63E-2-106, 63E-2-107, 63E-2-108, 63E-2-109, 63E-2-110, and 63E-2-111, but is not otherwise subject to or governed by Title 63E, Independent Entities Code.

